Utah statutes.
31A-17-613.   Effective date of notice.

A notice by the commissioner to an insurer or health organization that may result in regulatory action under this chapter is effective the sooner of:

(1)  the date the insurer or health organization receives the notice; or

(2)  three days after mailing the notice.

